Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
SURPLUS LINES INSURANCE

§431:8-300 Exemptions from surplus lines
law. This part shall not apply to reinsurance or to the
following insurance when placed by a licensed producer of this State:

(1) Ocean marine insurance;

(2) Insurance on subjects located, resident, or to be
performed wholly outside this State, or on vehicles or aircraft owned and
principally garaged outside this State; or

(3) Insurance of aircraft or cargo of such aircraft,
or against liability, other than workers' compensation and employer's
liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of such aircraft.
[L 1989, c 195, §2; am L 2002, c 155, §15]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next